Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6172YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2464 Section 1. Section 11.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. Upon notification of any suspected 3 misuse of public funds as described in subsection 7, the 4 certified public accountant and the governmental subdivision 5 shall cooperate with the auditor of state to establish 6 procedures to investigate the suspected embezzlement, theft, 7 or other significant financial irregularities. The auditor 8 of state shall determine if the auditor of state will perform 9 further procedures. The governmental subdivision shall 10 reimburse the auditor of state for any actions taken by the 11 auditor of state to investigate the suspected embezzlement, 12 theft, or other significant financial irregularities. The 13 costs assessed shall not exceed the amount of the public funds 14 misused as determined by the auditor. 15